Maine, session 132, LD827.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§1, ¶A-10, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 630, §1, is
amended to read:
A-10. "Cookware product" means a durable houseware product intended to be used on
a cooktop or in an oven to prepare, dispense or store food, foodstuffs or beverages,
including, but not limited to, a pot, pan, skillet, grill, baking sheet, baking mold, tray,
bowl and cooking utensil. "Cookware product" does not include a polymer-coated
durable item that the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Food
and Drug Administration authorizes for food contact.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§5, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 630, §1, is
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) A cookware product with a cooking surface that is intended to be in direct
contact with foodstuffs or beverages and containing intentionally added PFAS.
This subparagraph does not apply to a cookware product with a cooking surface
containing polytetrafluoroethylene, fluorinated ethylene propylene or
perfluoroalkoxy alkane;